District of Columbia statutes.
38-781.05

Summer school.

(a)

(1)

Each student retained for the failure to meet the promotion criteria specified in the DCMR shall attend the summer school session immediately following the school year in which the student was retained, unless specifically excused by the principal or the Chancellor.

(2)

A student who attends summer school pursuant to this section shall be reevaluated for promotion if the student:

(A)

Does not have more than 3 unexcused absences from summer school; and

(B)

Receives a passing grade in the subject or content area for which the student did not achieve a passing grade during the school year.

(3)

A student who meets the promotion criteria set forth in the DCMR after the completion of summer school shall be promoted.

(b)

In addition to those students identified to attend summer school pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, each principal shall provide to the Chancellor before the summer school registration deadline a list of the names of all students who the principal believes could benefit from summer school.

Feb. 22, 2014, D.C. Law 20-84, § 206, 61 DCR 178